Utah statutes.
34-23-202.   Employment of minors under 16 during school hours -- Hours of work limited.

(1)  A minor under the age of  16 may not be employed or permitted to work during school hours except as authorized by the proper school authorities.

(2)  A minor under the age of 16 may not be permitted to work:

(a)  before or after school in excess of four hours a day;

(b)  before 5:00 a.m.  or after 9:30 p.m., unless the next day is not a school day;

(c)  in excess of eight hours in any 24-hour period; or

(d)  more than 40 hours in any week.

